Wisconsin, session 2025, SB943.
do enact as follows:SB943,13Section 1. 62.23 (7) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB943,2,11462.23 (7) (c) Purposes in view. Such regulations shall be made in accordance 5with a comprehensive plan and designed to lessen congestion in the streets; to 6secure safety from fire, panic, and other dangers; to promote health and the general 7welfare; to provide adequate light and air, including access to sunlight for solar 8collectors and to wind for wind energy systems; to encourage the protection of 1groundwater resources; to prevent the overcrowding of land; to avoid undue 2concentration of population; to ensure that land is developed in a manner that 3supports healthy, livable communities; to foster the development of a range of 4housing types; to advance complete streets that prioritize safety, comfort, and 5accessibility for pedestrians, cyclists, transit riders, and motorists alike; to 6facilitate the adequate provision of transportation, water, sewerage, schools, parks, 7and other public requirements; and to preserve burial sites, as defined in s. 157.70 8(1) (b). Such regulations shall be made with reasonable consideration, among other 9things, of the character of the district and its peculiar suitability for particular 10uses, and with a view to conserving the value of buildings and encouraging the 11most appropriate use of land throughout such city.SB943,2,1212